Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
PART 1 General Provisions
27-3-9.
Unlawful enticement of game.

It shall be unlawful for any person to place, expose, deposit, distribute, or scatter any corn, wheat, or other grains, salts, apples, or other feeds or bait so as to constitute a lure or attraction or enticement for any game bird or game animal on or over any area where hunters are or will be hunting.

(a.1)

Nothing in subsection (a) of this Code section shall prohibit any person from placing, exposing, depositing, distributing, or scattering any corn, wheat, or other grains, salts, apples, or other feeds or bait so as to constitute a lure or attraction or enticement for deer on lands that are not under the ownership or control and management of the state or federal government; provided, however, that any such lure or attraction or enticement shall not be placed, exposed, deposited, distributed, or scattered so as to cause hunting any species of wildlife on any adjoining property to be prohibited under subsection (b) of this Code section.

Except as otherwise provided by law or regulation, it shall be unlawful for any person to hunt any game bird or game animal upon, over, around, or near any place where any corn, wheat, or other grains, salts, apples, or other feed or bait has been placed, exposed, deposited, distributed, or scattered so as to constitute a lure, attraction, or enticement to such birds or animals. It shall also be unlawful to hunt any game animal or game bird upon, over, around, or near any such place for a period of ten days following the complete removal of all such feed or bait.

The prohibitions of paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not apply to the hunting of deer, other than on lands under the ownership or control and management of the state or federal government, if the hunter has written permission of the landowner to hunt upon, over, around, or near such feed or bait, except as otherwise provided by paragraph (3) of this subsection.

The board may by rule or regulation restrict the feeding, baiting, or hunting of deer upon, over, around, or near such feed or bait in any county wherein there is a documented occurrence of a communicable disease in deer and in any county adjoining such county. Such restriction may be imposed in such county and any adjoining county for a period of up to and including one year and may be extended for additional periods of up to and including two years each upon documentation that the communicable disease is still present in deer in such county. No person shall feed, bait, or hunt deer in violation of any restriction imposed pursuant to this paragraph.

The department shall give notice of such restriction by mail or electronic means to each person holding a current license to hunt whose last known address is within a restricted county. The department may place or designate the placement of signs and markers so as to give notice of such restriction.

Any person who takes any big game animal, other than deer, within 200 yards of any place where any corn, wheat, or other grains, salts, apples, or other feed or bait has been placed, exposed, deposited, distributed, or scattered so as to constitute a lure, attraction, or enticement for any game bird or game animal shall, upon conviction of thereof, be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature and shall be punished as provided by Code Section 17-10-4.

When a game warden is aware or becomes aware that a clearly identifiable area of land or field is baited for doves in such a manner that hunting thereon would be a violation of paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of this Code section, it shall be the duty of the game warden to require the owner or other person having lawful possession or control of the baited area of land or field to remove such bait. The game warden shall require such owner or other person to erect on the area of land or field signs having printed thereon the words: “No Hunting, Baited Field.” Such signs shall remain for ten days after bait is removed. The printing on such signs shall be clearly visible to a person with normal eyesight from a distance of at least 50 yards. A sufficient number of such signs shall be erected to provide reasonable notice to hunters that the field or area is baited for doves. If the game warden cannot locate the owner or other person having lawful possession or control of the area of land or field baited for doves, it shall be the duty of such game warden to erect such signs. The owner or other person having lawful possession or control of an area or field baited for doves who fails to comply with an order of a game warden requiring the removal of bait or the erection of signs, or both, as required by this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. When a game warden is aware that a clearly identifiable area of land or field is baited for doves in such a manner that hunting thereon would be a violation of paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of this Code section prior to any such violation, no charge may be brought against any person under paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of this Code section unless the provisions of this subsection have been followed. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to preclude the owner or other person having lawful possession or control of a baited area or field from being charged with and convicted of a violation of subsection (a.1) of this Code section. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to preclude a person’s being charged with and convicted of a violation of paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of this Code section when such violation is on an area of land or field baited for doves which was not previously identified by a game warden as provided in this subsection prior to such violation.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 302, § 6; Code 1933, § 45-317; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 64; Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 18; Code 1933, § 45-508, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 469, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1179, § 5; Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 27/SB 103; Ga. L. 2011, p. 249, § 1/HB 277; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, §§ 4, 7/SB 72.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, deleted former subsection (a), which read: “As used in this Code section, the term:

“(1) ‘Northern zone’ means the northern zone for hunting deer with firearms as established pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 27-3-15.

“(2) ‘Southern zone’ means the southern zone for hunting deer with firearms as established pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 27-3-15.”;

redesignated former subsections (a.1) and (a.2) as present subsections (a) and (a.1), respectively; in subsection (a.1), substituted “subsection (a)” for “subsection (a.1)” near the beginning and inserted “be placed, exposed, deposited, distributed, or scattered so as to” and “any species of wildlife” near the end; rewrote paragraph (b)(2), which formerly read: “The prohibitions of paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not apply to:

“(A) The hunting of deer in the northern zone, other than on lands under the ownership or control and management of the state or federal government, if the hunter is at least 200 yards away from and not within sight of such feed or bait; and

“(B) The hunting of deer in the southern zone, other than on lands under the ownership or control and management of the state or federal government, if the hunter has written permission of the landowner to hunt upon, over, around, or near such feed or bait, except as otherwise provided by paragraph (3) of this subsection.”; and substituted “game warden” for “conservation ranger” throughout subsection (c).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1989, in subsection (c), “ten” was substituted for “10” in the third sentence, “(c)” was deleted following “this subsection” in the eighth sentence, and “person’s” was substituted for “person” in the tenth sentence.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 181 (2011).

For article, “Game and Fish:
Wildlife Generally,” see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 181 (2011).

27-3-10.
Hunting upon or discharging weapons across a public road.

It shall be unlawful for any person to hunt, with or without dogs, any wildlife upon any public road in this state. It shall also be unlawful for any person while hunting to discharge any weapon from or across any public road in this state.

Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than $50.00 and not more than $1,000.00 and, in the discretion of the sentencing court, imprisonment for not more than 12 months; provided, however, that such fine shall not be subject to suspension, stay, or probation except that if the court finds that payment of such fine would impose great economic hardship upon the defendant, the court may order such fine paid in installments.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 60; Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 17; Code 1933, § 45-509, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 43; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2391, § 2.

Cross references.

Discharge of gun or pistol near public highway or street, §

16-11-103

.

27-3-11.
[Reserved] Confiscation of vehicles and firearms used in hunting big game on public roads; state not required to negate exemptions in prosecutions.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2391, § 3, effective July 1, 1992.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 27/HB 79, reserved the designation of this Code section, effective April 24, 2013.

27-3-12.
Unlawful substances and equipment; computer assisted remote hunting prohibited.

It shall be unlawful to hunt any wild animal, game animal, or game bird by means of drugs, poisons, chemicals, smoke, gas, explosives, recorded calls or sounds, or recorded and electronically imitated or amplified sounds or calls. It shall also be unlawful to use electronic communications equipment for the purpose of facilitating pursuit of any wild animal, game bird, or game animal.

As used in this subsection, the term “computer assisted remote hunting” means the use of a computer or other device, equipment, hardware, or software to control remotely the aiming and discharge of a firearm or other weapon so as to allow a person not holding that firearm or other weapon to hunt or shoot a wild animal or any wildlife.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, or association to engage in computer assisted remote hunting or provide or operate a facility that allows others to engage in computer assisted remote hunting if the wild animal or wildlife being hunted or shot is located in this state.

Any person violating the provisions of this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than $1,000.00 and not more than $5,000.00, imprisonment for a term not to exceed 12 months, or both such fine and imprisonment.

Any equipment used or intended for use in a violation of this Code section, excluding motor vehicles, is declared to be contraband and shall be forfeited in accordance with the procedures set forth in Chapter 16 of Title 9.

The hunting and fishing privileges of any person convicted of violating this subsection shall be suspended for three years.

History.

Ga. L. 1911, p. 137, § 17; Code 1933, § 45-322; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1005, § 1; Ga. L. 1952, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 62; Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 20; Code 1933, § 45-510, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 44; Ga. L. 2006, p. 226, § 3/HB 338; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-18/HB 233.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date.
Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2015).

27-3-13.
Hunting of wildlife or feral hog from boats, aircraft, or motor vehicles.

It shall be unlawful to hunt any wildlife or feral hog from an electric, gas, or diesel boat, a steamboat, a sailboat, an aircraft, a hydroplane, a hovercraft, or a motor vehicle; except that alligators may be hunted from any boat or watercraft under power and feral hogs may be hunted from motor vehicles in accordance with an applicable wildlife control permit issued by the department.

Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than $250.00 and, in the discretion of the sentencing court, imprisonment for not more than 12 months; provided, however, that such fine shall not be subject to suspension, stay, or probation except that if the court finds that payment of such fine would impose great economic hardship upon the defendant, the court may order such fine paid in installments.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 61; Code 1933, § 45-511, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 45; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2391, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 27; Ga. L. 2003, p. 654, § 10; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1352, § 7/HB 475.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 1352, § 1/HB 475, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Feral Hog Control Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 1352, § 2/HB 475, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds that feral hogs are an invasive species in Georgia and are detrimental to the natural resources and agricultural production of the state.
Feral hogs cause significant damage to crops and wildlife habitat.
In addition, as carriers of communicable diseases, feral hogs pose a health risk to humans, livestock, companion animals, pets, and native wildlife.”

27-3-14.
Killing or crippling of game bird or game animal without reasonable effort to retrieve.

It shall be unlawful for any person to kill or cripple any game bird or game animal without making a reasonable effort to retrieve the same.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-512, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-3-15.
Seasons and bag limits; promulgation of rules and regulations by board; possession of more than bag limit; deer management assistance program.

It shall be unlawful to hunt the following game species at any time during the periods set forth below:

Click to view

It shall be unlawful to hunt the following game species at any time during the period set forth below, except that it shall not be unlawful to hunt the following game species during such periods or portions thereof, and in such number not to exceed the following numbers, as may be designated by the board as open seasons and bag limits for such species:

Click to view

In accordance with subsection (b) of this Code section and as may be appropriate, based on sound wildlife management principles, the board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations establishing open seasons on a state-wide, regional, or local basis and establishing daily and season bag limits.

In accordance with subsection (b) of this Code section and in accordance with the framework of open hunting season dates for migratory game birds established by the United States Fish and Wildlife Service and as may be appropriate based on sound wildlife management principles, the board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations establishing methods of taking, daily and season bag limits, and open seasons for migratory game birds on a state-wide, regional, or local basis. The board is specifically authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations without complying with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act”; and all rules and regulations promulgated by the board pursuant to this subsection shall be effective immediately upon adoption by the board.

It shall be unlawful for any person to possess more than the daily bag limit or more than the aggregate of the daily bag limits while in the field or while returning from the field to one’s automobile or principal means of land transportation or to one’s permanent abode or temporary or transient place of lodging or to a commercial storage facility or to a post office or to a common carrier facility.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, it shall be unlawful to take the species designated below, except squirrels, by means of falconry at any time during the period March 16 through September 30; but it shall not be unlawful to take the species designated below, except squirrels, by means of falconry during the period October 1 through March 15. It shall be unlawful to take squirrels by means of falconry at any time during the period March 16 through August 14, but it shall not be unlawful to take squirrels by means of falconry at any time during the period August 15 through March 15 in such number not exceeding the bag limits for each such species as follows:

Click to view

As may be appropriate based on sound principles of wildlife management, the department is authorized to establish a deer management assistance program, which may include fees and may prescribe property-specific bag limits without complying with the state-wide bag limit specified in subsection (b) of this Code section.

Game Species Closed Season (1) Quail March 16 — Oct. 31 (2) Grouse March 1 — Oct. 14 (3) Turkey (A) Gobblers May 22 — March 14 (B) Hens All year (4) Deer Jan. 16 — Sept. 7; except that as may be appropriate, and based solely on sound wildlife management principles, the department may by rule extend the season by region, by county, or locale to Jan. 31 for archery only. (5) Bobcat March 1 — Oct. 14 (6) Opossum No closed season, except as may be adopted by the board (7) Rabbit March 1 — Oct. 31 (8) Raccoon No closed season, except as may be adopted by the board (9) Squirrel March 1 — August 14 (10) Bear Jan. 16 — Sept. 7 (11) Sea turtles and their eggs All year (12) Cougar (Puma concolor) All year (13) Alligators Nov. 1 — March 31 (14) Migratory game birds March 11 — August 31

Game Species Maximum Open Season Maximum Bag Limits Daily Season (1) Quail Nov. 1 — March 15 12 No limit (2) Grouse Oct. 15 — Feb. 29 3 No limit (3) Turkey gobblers March 15 — May 21 3 3 (4) Deer Sept. 8 — Jan. 15; 12 12 except that as may be appropriate and based solely on sound wildlife management principles, the department may by rule extend the season by region, by county, or locale to Jan. 31 for archery only The department may by rule exempt deer taken on department managed lands from the state-wide bag limit. (5) Bobcat Oct. 15 — Feb. 29 No limit No limit (6) Opossum Jan. 1 — Dec. 31 No limit No limit (7) Rabbit Nov. 1 — Feb. 29 12 No limit (8) Raccoon Jan. 1 — Dec. 31 No limit No limit (9) Squirrel Aug. 15 — Feb. 29 12 No limit (10) Fox Jan. 1 — Dec. 31 No limit No limit (11) Migratory game birds Sept. 1 — March 10 Subject to limits set by the federal government and adopted by the board (12) Bear Sept. 8 — Jan. 15 2 2 The department may by rule exempt bear taken on department managed lands from the state-wide bag limit. (13) Alligators April 1 — Oct. 31 Subject to limits adopted by the board

Game Species Maximum Bag Limits Daily Season (1) Quail 12 No limit (2) Grouse 3 No limit (3) Rabbit 12 No limit (4) Squirrel 12 No limit

History.

Code 1933, § 45-513, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 46; Ga. L. 1979, p. 394, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, §§ 26, 27; Ga. L. 1980, p. 95, § 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 323, § 3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 798, §§ 9-12; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 27; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1263, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 20; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 27; Ga. L. 1988, p. 323, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 835, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 848, §§ 4, 5; Ga. L. 1989, p. 253, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1552, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 27; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2863, § 6; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1472, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1179, § 6; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1218, §§ 1, 2/HB 292; Ga. L. 2010, p. 952, § 4/SB 474; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 5/SB 72; Ga. L. 2020, p. 827, § 4-2/HB 998; Ga. L. 2021, p. 105, § 2-4/HB 362; Ga. L. 2022, p. 743, § 1/HB 1147.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in subsection (a), in the table, modified the Closed Season entries for items (4), (6), and (8), by substituting “except that as may be appropriate, and based solely on sound wildlife management principles, the department may by rule extend the season by region, by county, or locale to Jan. 31 for archery only” for “except that the closed season may be Feb. 1 — Sept. 7 in those counties specified as having an extended archery-only open season in paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of this Code section” in item (4), deleting “, for that area north of and including Haralson, Paulding, Bartow, Cherokee, Forsyth, Hall, Banks, Franklin, and Hart counties” in item (6), and by deleting “, for that area north of and including Carroll, Fulton, Gwinnett, Barrow, Clarke, Oglethorpe, Taliaferro, Wilkes, and Lincoln counties” in item (8); and substituted “Puma concolor” for “Felis concolor” in item (12); and, in subsection (b), in the table, rewrote the entries for items (4), (6), (8), and (12).

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 5, 2020, deleted former subsection (g), which read; “(g)(1) The department shall report to the General Assembly on or before the fifth day of February of each year the estimated number of deer killed, by sex, in the immediately preceding season.

“(2) Upon completion of its annual analysis of data from the immediately preceding season, the department shall report to the General Assembly on the same day that it reports to the Board of Natural Resources each year the actual number of deer killed, by sex, in the immediately preceding season.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective April 27, 2021, added subsection (g).

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 10, 2022, in the table in subsection (a), substituted “No closed season, except as may be adopted by the board” for “March 1 — Oct. 14” in items (6) and (8); and, in the table in subsection (b), substituted “Jan. 1 — Dec. 31” for “Oct. 15 — Feb. 29” in items (6) and (8).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, “August” was substituted for “Aug.” in paragraph (a)(14).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1989, a period was deleted at the end of paragraph (b)(13).

Law reviews.

For article, “Game and Fish:
Wildlife Generally,” see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 181 (2011).

27-3-16.
Hunting with dogs generally; training of hunting dogs.

It shall be unlawful for any person to have in his or her possession any firearms, axes, climbers, or other equipment for taking game while training hunting dogs, provided that handguns with blank ammunition or shot cartridges may be used for training hunting dogs, and shotguns with number six shot or smaller shot may be used while training pointing, flushing, and retrieving dogs using pen raised quail and pigeons.

There is no closed season for training hunting dogs, except as otherwise provided.

It shall be unlawful to run deer with dogs, except during the lawful open season for hunting deer with dogs.

It shall be unlawful to take game by any means while training hunting dogs, except during the lawful open seasons for such game; provided, however, that pen raised quail may be taken at any time for training hunting dogs if the dog trainer maintains proof of purchase of pen raised quail.

It shall be unlawful for any person to train hunting dogs on property other than that owned by such person or his immediate family unless such person has a hunting license in his immediate possession.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-514, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 47; Ga. L. 1984, p. 537, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 807, § 2.

27-3-17.
Hunting deer with dogs; seasons; permit required.

It shall be unlawful to hunt deer with dogs except during such special open seasons for the hunting of deer with dogs as may be designated by the board on a state-wide, regional, or local basis.

In accordance with subsection (a) of this Code section, the board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations establishing an open season for the hunting of deer with dogs as may be appropriate based on sound wildlife management principles.

It shall be unlawful for any person to hunt deer with dogs on any tract of real property unless a permit for hunting deer with dogs has been issued by the department for such tract to the owner or owners of such tract or the lessee of deer hunting rights for such tract. A permit for hunting deer with dogs shall not be issued to a lessee of deer hunting rights for any tract of real property that is less than 1,000 contiguous acres or to the property owner or owners for any tract of real property that is less than 250 contiguous acres. Any application for a permit for hunting deer with dogs shall be on such form as prescribed by the department and shall include a written description of the tract boundaries and a map showing key features such as public roads or streams on or bordering the tract and occupied dwellings on adjacent properties. The application must be signed by all persons owning any portion of the tract of real property or an authorized agent thereof.

The owner of any dog that is used for hunting deer must cause such dog to be identified at all times during the hunt with the permit number for the tract being hunted.

Any person operating a motor vehicle used in conducting a deer hunt with dogs shall during such hunt clearly display in the front or rear windshield of such motor vehicle a decal or card showing the tract permit number in numerals not less than two inches high.

The department shall thoroughly investigate for validity any complaints from adjacent property owners regarding hunting deer with dogs in violation of this title or rules and regulations issued pursuant to this title. The commissioner may take action against a permit as provided by Code Section 27-2-25 for violations of the provisions of this title or rules and regulations issued pursuant to this title occurring on the tract of real property for which the permit was issued.

In addition to the provisions of subsection (f) of this Code section, the commissioner may suspend deer-dog hunting privileges for a specified period of time not to exceed two years for any hunter who, within a single hunting season, commits two or more violations of dogs off of permitted property. The hunter shall be notified of the proposed suspension personally or by a letter sent by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the hunter’s address indicated on the application for a hunting license. The proposed suspension shall become final 30 days after issuance if not appealed as provided in this Code section. The hunter shall, upon petition within 30 days of issuance of notice given as stated in this Code section, have a right to a hearing before an administrative law judge appointed by the board. The hearing before the administrative law judge shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” and the rules and regulations adopted by the board pursuant thereto. The decision of the administrative law judge shall constitute the final decision of the board, and any party to the hearing, including the commissioner, shall have the right of judicial review thereof in accordance with such chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 58; Code 1933, § 45-515, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 654, § 11; Ga. L. 2005, p. 655, § 2/SB 206; Ga. L. 2006, p. 502, § 1/HB 1424; Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 13/HB 208.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, deleted former subsection (g), which read: “Any person 16 years of age or older, including without limitation any person hunting on his or her own property, who hunts deer with dogs must obtain and possess a deer-dog hunting license in addition to all other required hunting licenses and permits. The license fee for such deer-dog license shall be $5.00 for a one-year period, except that there shall be no charge for any holder of a valid honorary hunting license, sportsman’s license, or lifetime sportsman’s license issued pursuant to this title.”; redesignated former subsection (h) as present subsection (g); and rewrote subsection (g). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Cross references.

Killing of dogs pursuing or killing deer, §

27-3-49

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 27, § 20/HB 208, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall be applicable to all offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2017.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Hunting regulations, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Wildlife Resources Division, Subject 391-4-2.

Permit requirements for hunting deer with dogs, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Wildlife Resources Division, Hunting Regulations, § 391-4-2-.29.

27-3-18.
Hunting foxes with dogs.

It shall be lawful to hunt foxes with dogs; provided, however, that no hunter shall go upon the land of another without the permission of the owner or the lessee of such land or the lessee of the game rights of such land.

History.

Ga. L. 1931, p. 172, § 1; Code 1933, § 45-333; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 57; Code 1933, § 45-516, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-3-19.
Hunting alligators; possessing alligator products; gathering alligator eggs.

Except as provided in Code Section 27-3-15, it shall be unlawful for any person to hunt alligators within this state. The display or use of a light in any area closed to alligator hunting by any person not otherwise authorized to do so by regulations of the board in a place which alligators might be known to inhabit and in a manner capable of disclosing the presence of alligators, together with the possession of firearms, spear guns, gigs, harpoons, or other such equipment customarily used for the taking of alligators, during the period between one-half hour after sunset and one-half hour before sunrise shall be considered prima-facie evidence of an intent to violate this subsection.

Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than $500.00 and, in the discretion of the sentencing court, imprisonment for not more than 12 months; provided, however, that such fine shall not be subject to suspension, stay, or probation except that if the court finds that payment of such fine would impose great economic hardship upon the defendant, the court may order such fine paid in installments.

It shall be unlawful for any person to possess, buy, or sell in this state the untanned hide or skin or alligator products from an alligator not lawfully taken under the authority of Code Section 27-3-15. All such hides, skins, and alligators not lawfully taken are declared to be contraband and shall be seized and disposed of as directed by the commissioner. Possession in a store, warehouse, or retail place of business of such untanned hides or skins or alligator products not lawfully taken shall be prima-facie evidence of violation of this subsection. This subsection shall not apply to alligator products made from hides or skins of alligators produced on farms licensed under this title or from hides or skins of alligators lawfully possessed, taken, or acquired outside or inside this state, nor shall any provision of this subsection be construed so as to prohibit the preparation, processing, or manufacturing of such commercially grown or lawfully possessed, taken, or acquired alligator hides or the storage or sale of products made therefrom, subject to rules and regulations promulgated by the board.

It shall be unlawful for any person to gather alligator eggs from the wild or possess alligator eggs gathered from the wild in this state except pursuant to permit issued by the department for such purpose. The board shall establish the conditions of such permits by such rules or regulations as are reasonable and necessary under sound game management practices, which shall include without limitation specification of when and where such eggs may be gathered, limits on the number of eggs that may be gathered, the placement of gathered eggs in incubators, return of a minimum percentage and size of hatchlings from gathered eggs to the wild, and permit fees in such amounts as are necessary to cover the cost of administration. This paragraph shall not apply to the collection of alligator eggs from an alligator farm licensed under this title.

It shall be unlawful to possess or transport into this state any untanned alligator hide, skin, or alligator product from any place in which the taking of alligators is prohibited.

It shall be unlawful to possess or transport into this state any alligator eggs gathered from the wild from any place where such gathering of alligator eggs from the wild is prohibited.

All such hides, skins, alligator products, and alligator eggs are declared to be contraband and shall be seized and disposed of in accordance with Code Section 27-1-21.

Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, it shall be lawful to possess and transport into this state any untanned alligator hide, skin, alligator product, or alligator egg which was lawfully taken and transported and which is accompanied by a bill of sale, bill of lading, invoice, or permit.

Any person who possesses any untanned alligator hide, skin, alligator product, or alligator egg from any place in which the taking of alligators is lawful, the gathering of alligator eggs from the wild is lawful, or from an alligator farm licensed under this title shall retain such receipts, invoices, bills of lading, permits, or other indicia of lawful possession, taking, or acquisition as are necessary to indicate clearly at all times the place of origin of the specific untanned alligator hides, skins, alligator products, or alligator eggs possessed.

The hunting privileges of a person found guilty of hunting alligators at night in violation of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be suspended by the court of jurisdiction for a period not less than two years.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 590, § 8; Ga. L. 1968, p. 479, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 236, § 3; Code 1933, § 45-527, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 27; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1619, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 848, § 6; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2391, § 5; Ga. L. 2003, p. 654, § 12.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Nuisance alligator harvest, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Wildlife Resources Division, Subject 391-4-2.

27-3-19.1.
Regulation of the exporting, farming, and selling of fresh-water turtles.

It shall be unlawful to export, farm, or sell any fresh-water turtle or part thereof except in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board.

As the board deems appropriate for purposes of this Code section, it may promulgate such rules and regulations as are reasonable and necessary under sound wildlife management practices.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-3-19.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 952, § 5/SB 474.

27-3-20.
Taking rabbits and hares out of season.

It shall be unlawful for any person to take rabbits or hares in this state except during the lawful hunting season as prescribed by law or rules and regulations. Persons under 16 years of age may trap or capture rabbits or hares by use of rabbit boxes or similar traps and sell them under the conditions set forth in Code Section 27-3-67.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 3, §§ 1-3A; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 63; Ga. L. 1956, p. 590, § 23; Ga. L. 1972, p. 925, § 3; Code 1933, § 45-528, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-3-21.
Killing of bears by property owners.

Any property owner or his or her agent shall have the right to petition the department to remove any bear which shall constitute a clear and immediate threat to his or her property.
The property owner shall petition the department for such removal on a form containing such information as may be necessary for the proper evaluation and consideration of the application. Removal shall occur only in cases where the department has determined that the removal of the bear is justified.
Representatives of the department are authorized to investigate claims of damage and the necessity of removal of the bear prior to taking action on the petition.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-529, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1755, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 392, § 2.

27-3-22.
Hunting, possessing, or transporting birds generally.

It shall be unlawful for any person to hunt, trap, take, possess, sell, purchase, ship, or transport any hawk, eagle, owl, or any other bird or any part, nest, or egg thereof, except for the English or European house sparrow, the European starling, feral pigeons, and domestic fowl, and except as otherwise permitted by the game and fish laws of this state; provided, however, that any person may transport into this state feathers of birds, other than migratory game birds, for millinery purposes.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 476, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, § 45-530, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-3-23.
Sale of tails of squirrels.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title to the contrary, it shall be lawful to sell the tails of legally taken squirrels.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-526, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.